Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1501
Statement of policy.

It is the public policy of this state to provide its citizens with adequate electric service at as low an overall cost as possible, consistent with sound business practices, and in furtherance of such policy it is necessary to avoid and eliminate conflict and competition among and between suppliers of electric power and energy and to avoid duplication of facilities and resources which result from such conflict and competition.

Laws 1984, LB 805, § 1.